North Carolina, session 2025, HB482.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Establish Consolidated Bonus Program. – The State Board of
Education shall establish a consolidated teacher bonus program for the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To
attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to qualifying
teachers whose salaries are supported from State funds in January of 2026 and 2027, based on
data from the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years, respectively, in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Eligible advanced course teacher. – A teacher of Advanced Placement
courses, International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, or the
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program
who meets the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, one or more
of the following:
1. A qualifying public school unit.
2. The North Carolina Virtual Public School program.
b. Taught one or more students who received a score listed in subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Eligible career and technical education (CTE) teacher. – A teacher who meets
the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit.
b. Taught one or more students who attained approved industry
certifications or credentials consistent with G.S. 115C-156.2.
(3) Eligible growth teacher. – A teacher who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
*H482-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth
or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth,
fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the
previous school year.
b. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a local school
administrative unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade
reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth
grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous
school year.
c. Was employed by a local school administrative unit that employed in
the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in that teacher's
grade level as long as the teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth in
one of the following subject areas:
1. Third grade reading.
2. Fourth or fifth grade reading.
3. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics.
(4) EVAAS. – The Education Value-Added Assessment System.
(5) Qualifying public school unit. – Any of the following:
a. A local school administrative unit.
b. A charter school.
c. A regional school.
d. A school providing elementary or secondary instruction operated by
The University of North Carolina under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of
the General Statutes.
(6) Qualifying teacher. – An eligible teacher who meets one of the following
criteria:
a. Remains employed teaching in the same qualifying public school unit
or, if an eligible advanced course teacher is only employed by the
North Carolina Virtual Public School program, remains employed
teaching in that program, at least from the school year the data is
collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the
bonus is paid.
Page 2 House Bill 482-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Retired, between the last day of the school year in which the data is
collected and January 1 of the corresponding school year in which the
bonus is paid, after attaining one of the following:
1. The age of at least 65 with five years of creditable service.
2. The age of at least 60 with 25 years of creditable service.
3. Thirty years of creditable service.
c. Left employment with the qualifying public school unit after the last
day of the school year in which the data is collected due to the transfer
or pending transfer of a spouse pursuant to an official military order.
In order to receive a bonus pursuant to this sub-subdivision, a
qualifying teacher shall provide the following information to the
qualifying public school unit by January 1 of the school year in which
the bonus is to be paid:
1. Notice of the transfer.
2. An updated mailing address for the teacher.
SECTION 1.(c) Advanced Course Bonuses. – A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars
($50.00) shall be provided to qualifying advanced course teachers for each student taught in each
advanced course who receives the following score:
(1) For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College
Board Advanced Placement Examination.
(2) For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four
or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.
(3) For the Cambridge AICE program, a score of "E" or higher on the Cambridge
AICE program examinations.
SECTION 1.(d) CTE Bonuses. – For qualifying career and technical education
teachers, bonuses shall be provided in the following amounts:
(1) A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught
by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of
an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) value
ranking as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a
teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an
industry certification or credential with a fifty dollar ($50.00) value ranking
as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
SECTION 1.(e) CTE Course Value Ranking. – The Department of Commerce, in
consultation with the State Board, shall assign a value ranking for each industry certification and
credential based on academic rigor and employment value in accordance with this subsection.
Fifty percent (50%) of the ranking shall be based on academic rigor and the remaining fifty
percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and employment value shall be based on
the following elements:
(1) Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including
work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification
or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides
community college credit.
(2) Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in
employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for
the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.
SECTION 1.(f) Statewide Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this act
for the program, bonuses shall be provided to qualifying teachers who are eligible teachers under
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
House Bill 482-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision a.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be distributed equally among
qualifying teachers.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 1.(g) Local Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this act for
the program, bonuses shall be provided to eligible teachers under sub-subdivisions b. and c. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible EVAAS teachers under sub-sub-subdivisions b.1. and c.1. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be divided
proportionally based on average daily membership in third grade for each
local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying
third grade reading teachers in each local school administrative unit.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.2. or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.3. or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 1.(h) Limitations and Other Criteria. – The following additional
limitations and other criteria shall apply to the program:
(1) Bonus funds awarded to a teacher pursuant to subsection (c), subsection (d),
subdivision (1) of subsection (f), and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this
section shall not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per
subsection or subdivision in any given school year.
(2) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1.,
b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than seven thousand
dollars ($7,000) pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision
(1) of subsection (g) of this section in any given school year.
(3) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.2.,
b.2., or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(4) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.3.,
b.3., or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
SECTION 1.(i) Bonuses Not Compensation. – Bonuses awarded to a teacher
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives
Page 4 House Bill 482-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or is scheduled to receive. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded under this
section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement
System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 1.(j) Study and Report. – The State Board of Education shall study the
effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the
results of its findings and the amount of bonuses awarded to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information:
(1) Number of students enrolled and taking examinations in each of the following
categories of courses:
a. Advanced Placement.
b. International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
c. Cambridge AICE program.
d. Courses needed for the attainment of an industry certification or
credential.
(2) Number of students receiving outcomes on examinations resulting in the
award of a bonus for a teacher in each category of courses identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Number of teachers receiving a bonus in each category of courses identified
in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The amounts awarded to teachers for each category of courses identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(5) The type of industry certifications and credentials earned by the students, the
value ranking for each certification and credential, the number of bonuses
earned for each certification or credential, and the total bonus amount awarded
for each certification or credential.
(6) Average bonus amount awarded to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible
teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1., b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section.
(7) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
were eligible to receive a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course
in January 2024 or January 2025, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one
of the following programs:
a. The Advanced Course and CTE Bonus Program provided in Section
7A.4 of S.L. 2021-180.
b. The Growth-Based Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 7A.2
of S.L. 2022-74.
(8) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in either
January 2024 or January 2025 pursuant to one of the programs listed in
subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(9) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in January
2024 or January 2025, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one of the
programs listed in subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(10) The statistical relationship between a teacher receiving a bonus in January
2026 or 2027 pursuant to this section and receiving a bonus pursuant to a
predecessor bonus program. For purposes of this subdivision, the following
are predecessor programs:
House Bill 482-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(c) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
b. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(d) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section.
c. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this section.
d. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of this section.
e. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) and subdivision (d)(3)
of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are predecessors to bonuses awarded
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section.
(11) The distribution of statewide and local growth bonuses awarded pursuant to
this section as among qualifying public school units and, where applicable,
schools within those units.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 6 House Bill 482-First Edition